Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.15
Examining board; sue and be sued; liability of members.

The examining board may sue or be sued as the examining board, and its members need not be named as parties. Members of the examining board shall not be personally liable, jointly or severally, for any act or acts committed in the performance of their official duties as examining board members, nor shall any examining board member be personally liable for any hearing costs or court costs which may accrue in any action by or against the examining board.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 17;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 11.